Illinois, session 104th, HB4002.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 109-1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/109-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 109-1)7    Sec. 109-1. Person arrested; release from law enforcement 8custody and court appearance; geographic constraints prevent 9in-person appearances. 10    (a) A person arrested with or without a warrant for an 11offense for which pretrial release may be denied under 12paragraphs (1) through (6) of Section 110-6.1 shall be taken 13without unnecessary delay before the nearest and most 14accessible judge in that county, except when such county is a 15participant in a regional jail authority, in which event such 16person may be taken to the nearest and most accessible judge, 17irrespective of the county where such judge presides, within 1848 hours, and a charge shall be filed. Whenever a person 19arrested either with or without a warrant is required to be 20taken before a judge, a charge may be filed against such person 21by way of a two-way audio-visual communication system, except 22that a hearing to deny pretrial release to the defendant may 23not be conducted by two-way audio-visual communication system   HB4002- 2 -LRB104 12418 RLC 22704 b1unless the accused waives the right to be present physically 2in court, the court determines that the physical health and 3safety of any person necessary to the proceedings would be 4endangered by appearing in court, or the chief judge of the 5circuit orders use of that system due to operational 6challenges in conducting the hearing in person. Such 7operational challenges must be documented and approved by the 8chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the 9challenges through reasonable efforts must be presented and 10approved by the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts 11every 6 months.12    (a-1) Law enforcement shall issue a citation in lieu of 13custodial arrest, upon proper identification, for those 14accused of any offense that is not a felony or Class A or B 15misdemeanor unless (i) a law enforcement officer reasonably 16believes the accused poses a threat to the community or any 17person, (ii) a custodial arrest is necessary because the 18criminal activity persists after the issuance of a citation, 19or (iii) the accused has an obvious medical or mental health 20issue that poses a risk to the accused's own safety. Nothing in 21this Section requires arrest in the case of Class A or B 22misdemeanor and felony offenses, or otherwise limits existing 23law enforcement discretion to decline to effect a custodial 24arrest. 25    (a-3) A person arrested with or without a warrant for an 26offense for which pretrial release may not be denied may,   HB4002- 3 -LRB104 12418 RLC 22704 b1except as otherwise provided in this Code, be released by a law 2enforcement officer without appearing before a judge. A 3presumption in favor of pretrial release shall be applied by 4an arresting officer in the exercise of his or her discretion 5under this Section. 6    (a-5) A person charged with an offense shall be allowed 7counsel at the hearing at which pretrial release is determined 8under Article 110 of this Code. If the defendant desires 9counsel for his or her initial appearance but is unable to 10obtain counsel, the court shall appoint a public defender or 11licensed attorney at law of this State to represent him or her.12    (b) Upon initial appearance of a person before the court, 13the judge shall:14        (1) inform the defendant of the charge against him and 15    shall provide him with a copy of the charge;16        (2) advise the defendant of his right to counsel and 17    if indigent shall appoint a public defender or licensed 18    attorney at law of this State to represent him in 19    accordance with the provisions of Section 113-3 of this 20    Code;21        (3) schedule a preliminary hearing in appropriate 22    cases; 23        (4) admit the defendant to pretrial release in 24    accordance with the provisions of Article 110 of this 25    Code, or upon verified petition of the State, proceed with 26    the setting of a detention hearing as provided in Section   HB4002- 4 -LRB104 12418 RLC 22704 b1    110-6.1; and2        (5) order the confiscation of the person's passport or 3    impose travel restrictions on a defendant arrested for 4    first degree murder or other violent crime as defined in 5    Section 3 of the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses 6    Act, if the judge determines, based on the factors in 7    Section 110-5 of this Code, that this will reasonably 8    ensure the appearance of the defendant and compliance by 9    the defendant with all conditions of release. 10    (c) The court may issue an order of protection in 11accordance with the provisions of Article 112A of this Code. 12Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's Attorney's 13office of this hearing as required in paragraph (2) of 14subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime Victims 15and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their opportunity 16at this hearing to obtain an order of protection under Article 17112A of this Code. 18    (d) At the initial appearance of a defendant in any 19criminal proceeding, the court must advise the defendant in 20open court that any foreign national who is arrested or 21detained has the right to have notice of the arrest or 22detention given to his or her country's consular 23representatives and the right to communicate with those 24consular representatives if the notice has not already been 25provided. The court must make a written record of so advising 26the defendant.  HB4002- 5 -LRB104 12418 RLC 22704 b1    (e) If consular notification is not provided to a 2defendant before his or her first appearance in court, the 3court shall grant any reasonable request for a continuance of 4the proceedings to allow contact with the defendant's 5consulate. Any delay caused by the granting of the request by a 6defendant shall temporarily suspend for the time of the delay 7the period within which a person shall be tried as prescribed 8by subsection (a), (b), or (e) of Section 103-5 of this Code 9and on the day of the expiration of delay the period shall 10continue at the point at which it was suspended. 11    (f) At the hearing at which conditions of pretrial release 12are determined, the person charged shall be present in person 13rather than by two-way audio-video communication system unless 14the accused waives the right to be present physically in 15court, the court determines that the physical health and 16safety of any person necessary to the proceedings would be 17endangered by appearing in court, or the chief judge of the 18circuit orders use of that system due to operational 19challenges in conducting the hearing in person. Such 20operational challenges must be documented and approved by the 21chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the 22challenges through reasonable efforts must be presented and 23approved by the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts 24every 6 months.25    (g) Defense counsel shall be given adequate opportunity to 26confer with the defendant prior to any hearing in which   HB4002- 6 -LRB104 12418 RLC 22704 b1conditions of release or the detention of the defendant is to 2be considered, with a physical accommodation made to 3facilitate attorney/client consultation. If defense counsel 4needs to confer or consult with the defendant during any 5hearing conducted via a two-way audio-visual communication 6system, such consultation shall not be recorded and shall be 7undertaken consistent with constitutional protections. 8(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 9102-1104, eff. 1-1-23.)